Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution, article IV, section 4, and article V, sections 2 and 4, is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, article IV, section 4, will read: new text end Sec. 4. Representatives shall be chosen for a term of two years, except to fill a vacancy. Senators shall be chosen for a term of four years, except to fill a vacancy and except there shall be an entire new election of all the senators at the first election of representatives after each new legislative apportionment provided for in this article.new text begin No person may file to be a candidate for election to a fifth full term in the house of representatives. No person may file to be a candidate for election to a fourth full term in the senate.new text end The governor shall call elections to fill vacancies in either house of the legislature. new text begin article V, section 2, will read: new text end Sec. 2. The term of office for the governor and lieutenant governor is four years and until a successor is chosen and qualified.new text begin No person may file to be a candidate for election to a third full term as governor or to a third full term as lieutenant governor. new text end Each shall have attained the age of 25 years and, shall have been a bona fide resident of the state for one year next preceding deleted text begin hisdeleted text end new text begin the person'snew text end election, and shall be a citizen of the United States. new text begin article V, section 4, will read: new text end Sec. 4. The term of office of the secretary of state, attorney generalnew text begin ,new text end and state auditor is four years and until a successor is chosen and qualified.new text begin No person may file to be a candidate for election to a third full term in one of the offices of secretary of state, attorney general, or state auditor. new text end The duties and salaries of the executive officers shall be prescribed by law. Sec. 2. new text begin APPLICATION; SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin (a) The amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. new text end new text begin The question submitted to the people shall be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to place limits on the terms of office of state legislators and executive officers? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end new text begin (b) Terms ending before or in 2027 must not be counted for the purpose of term limits in section 1. new text end